Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Administrative Dissolution

§ 17-19-1420.
Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under W.S.

17-19-1421

to administratively dissolve a corporation if any of the following has occurred:

The corporation is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for thirty (30) days or more;

The corporation does not notify the secretary of state within thirty (30) days that its registered agent or registered office has been changed, that its registered agent has resigned or that its registered office has been discontinued;

The corporation’s period of duration, if any, stated in its articles of incorporation expires;

The corporation does not deliver its annual reports or pay the annual license taxes to the secretary of state when due pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1630

;

It is in the public interest and the corporation:

Has provided fraudulent information or has failed to correct false information upon request of the secretary of state on any filing under this act with the secretary of state; or

Cannot be served by either the secretary of state or the registered agent at its address provided pursuant to W.S.

17-28-107

.

An incorporator, director, officer or agent of the corporation signed a document he knew was false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the secretary of state for filing;

The corporation has failed to respond to a valid and enforceable subpoena;

The corporation has failed to pay any penalties imposed under W.S.

17-28-109

.

Prior to commencing a proceeding under W.S.

17-19-1421

the secretary of state may classify a corporation as delinquent awaiting administrative dissolution if the corporation meets any of the criteria in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 91, § 2; 2014 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment by ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-107” for “17-16-507” in (a)(v)(B).

The second 2008 amendment by ch. 91, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, in (a) by adding (a)(vi) and (a)(vii), adding (b) and making stylistic changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the introductory paragraph of (a), inserted “any of the following has occurred”; in (a)(vi), made stylistic changes; and added (a)(viii).

§ 17-19-1421.
Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.

Upon determining that one (1) or more grounds exist under W.S.

17-19-1420

for dissolving a corporation, the secretary of state shall serve the corporation with written notice of that determination under W.S.

17-28-104

. In the case of a public benefit corporation the secretary of state shall also notify the attorney general in writing.

If the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within at least sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected under W.S.

17-28-104

, the secretary of state may administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation under W.S.

17-28-104

, and in the case of a public benefit corporation shall notify the attorney general in writing.

A corporation administratively dissolved continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any activities except those necessary to wind up and liquidate its affairs under W.S.

17-19-1406

and notify its claimants under W.S.

17-19-1407

and

17-19-1408

.

The administrative dissolution of a corporation does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 91, § 3.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 91, §§ 2, 3.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment by ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-104” for “17-19-504” once in (a) and twice in (b).

The second 2008 amendment by ch. 91, §§ 2, 3, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by deleting “except for dissolution pursuant to W.S. 17-19-1420(a)(iv) in which case notice of the proposed dissolution shall be given only as provided in subsection (e) of this section” at the end of the first sentence in (a); deleting the former last sentence of (b) which read: “The provisions of subsection (e) of this section shall govern the procedures for dissolution pursuant to W.S. 17-19-1420(a)(iv)”; repealing former (e) which read: “Administrative dissolution of a corporation pursuant to W.S. 17-19-1420(a)(iv) shall be accomplished in accordance with the provisions of this subsection only. Prior to administratively dissolving a corporation pursuant to W.S. 17-19-1420(a)(iv), the secretary of state shall provide notice to the corporation at its last known mailing address by first class mail and publish once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the registered office of the corporation is located, notice that the corporation failed to comply with W.S.

17-19-1630

. If the corporation does not correct the deficiency within sixty (60) days after the first date of publication the corporation shall be deemed dissolved. The effect of the dissolution shall be as provided in this section.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 17-19-1422.
Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

A corporation administratively dissolved under W.S.

17-19-1421

may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement within two (2) years after the effective date of dissolution. Reinstatement may be denied by the secretary of state if the corporation has been the subject of secretary of state and law enforcement investigation pertaining to fraud or any other violation of state or federal law, or if there is other reason to believe the corporation was engaged in illegal operations. The application shall:

Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 196, § 2.

If the corporation was administratively dissolved for failing to deliver its annual report or pay the annual license taxes to the secretary of state when due pursuant to W.S.

17-19-1630

, include payment of fees and taxes then delinquent and the reinstatement certificate fee prescribed by W.S.

17-19-122

; and

If the corporation was administratively dissolved for failure to maintain a registered agent, include payment of a one hundred fifty dollar ($150.00) reinstatement fee and payment of any fees and taxes then delinquent.

If the secretary of state determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section and that the information is correct, the secretary of state shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement reciting that determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the corporation under W.S.

17-28-104

.

When reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution and the corporation shall resume carrying on its activities as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

The corporation shall retain its registered corporate name during the two (2) year reinstatement period.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 1999, ch. 196, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 91, § 2; 2010, ch. 60, § 1.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment by ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-104” for “17-19-504” in (b).

The second 2008 amendment by ch. 91, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by adding (a)(v), and making stylistic changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(iv) and (a)(v), substituted “include payment of fees” for “include payment of a sum equal to double the amount of fees,” and made similar changes.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch. 60, § 2, effective July 1, 2010, provides:

“(a) Notwithstanding
section 1 of this act, if 2010 Senate File 18 is enacted into law,
the amendment of
W.S. 17-15-112(b) in section 1 of this act shall not be effective.

“(b) This section shall
not be effective if 2010 Senate File 18 is not enacted into law.”

§ 17-19-1423.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

The secretary of state, upon denying a corporation’s application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, shall serve the corporation under W.S.

17-28-104

with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the district court within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The corporation appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the secretary of state’s certificate of dissolution, the corporation’s application for reinstatement, and the secretary of state’s notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to reinstate the dissolved corporation or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-104” for “17-19-504” in (a).